test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VLONG_INDEP_boodawe_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     boodawe+VAI: boodawe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+boodawe+VAI: niboodawe
     2+boodawe+VAI: giboodawe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     boodawe+VAI+Neg: boodawesii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl: boodawemin
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl: boodawemw
     boodawe+VAI+3: boodawew
     boodawe+VAI+X: boodawem
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     boodawe+VAI+Dub: boodawedig
     boodawe+VAI+Prt: boodaweban
     boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub: boodawegoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     boodawe+VAI+3+4: boodawean
     boodawe+VAI+3+Pl: boodaweag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg: niboodawesii
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg: giboodawesii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl: niboodawemin
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl: niboodawemw
     1+boodawe+VAI+3: niboodawew
     1+boodawe+VAI+X: niboodawem
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl: giboodawemin
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl: giboodawemw
     2+boodawe+VAI+3: giboodawew
     2+boodawe+VAI+X: giboodawem
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+boodawe+VAI+Dub: niboodawedig
     1+boodawe+VAI+Prt: niboodaweban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub: niboodawegoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Dub: giboodawedig
     2+boodawe+VAI+Prt: giboodaweban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub: giboodawegoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+4: niboodawean
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Pl: niboodaweag
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+4: giboodawean
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Pl: giboodaweag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: boodawesiimin
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: boodawesiimw
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3: boodawesiiw
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X: boodawesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub: boodawesiidig
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt: boodawesiiban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: boodawesiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+4: boodawesiian
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: boodawesiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: boodawemindig
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: boodaweminban
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: boodawemingoban
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: boodawemwdig
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: boodawemwban
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: boodawemwgoban
     boodawe+VAI+3+Dub: boodawewdig
     boodawe+VAI+3+Prt: boodawewban
     boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: boodawewgoban
     boodawe+VAI+X+Dub: boodawemdig
     boodawe+VAI+X+Prt: boodawemban
     boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: boodawemgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: boodaweminan
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: boodaweminag
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: boodawemwan
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: boodawemwag
     boodawe+VAI+3+3+4: boodawewan
     boodawe+VAI+3+3+Pl: boodawewag
     boodawe+VAI+X+3+4: boodaweman
     boodawe+VAI+X+3+Pl: boodawemag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     boodawe+VAI+Dub+3+4: boodawedigan
     boodawe+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: boodawedigag
     boodawe+VAI+Prt+3+4: boodawebanan
     boodawe+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: boodawebanag
     boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawegobanan
     boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawegobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: niboodawesiimin
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: niboodawesiimw
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3: niboodawesiiw
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X: niboodawesiim
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: giboodawesiimin
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: giboodawesiimw
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3: giboodawesiiw
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X: giboodawesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub: niboodawesiidig
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt: niboodawesiiban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: niboodawesiigoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub: giboodawesiidig
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt: giboodawesiiban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub: giboodawesiigoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+4: niboodawesiian
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: niboodawesiiag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+4: giboodawesiian
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Pl: giboodawesiiag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: niboodawemindig
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: niboodaweminban
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niboodawemingoban
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: niboodawemwdig
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: niboodawemwban
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niboodawemwgoban
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Dub: niboodawewdig
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt: niboodawewban
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: niboodawewgoban
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Dub: niboodawemdig
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt: niboodawemban
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: niboodawemgoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: giboodawemindig
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: giboodaweminban
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: giboodawemingoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: giboodawemwdig
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: giboodawemwban
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: giboodawemwgoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Dub: giboodawewdig
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt: giboodawewban
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: giboodawewgoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Dub: giboodawemdig
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt: giboodawemban
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: giboodawemgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: niboodaweminan
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: niboodaweminag
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: niboodawemwan
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: niboodawemwag
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+3+4: niboodawewan
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+3+Pl: niboodawewag
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+3+4: niboodaweman
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+3+Pl: niboodawemag
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+3+4: giboodaweminan
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+3+Pl: giboodaweminag
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+3+4: giboodawemwan
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+3+Pl: giboodawemwag
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+3+4: giboodawewan
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+3+Pl: giboodawewag
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+3+4: giboodaweman
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+3+Pl: giboodawemag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+Dub+3+4: niboodawedigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawedigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Prt+3+4: niboodawebanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawebanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawegobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawegobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Dub+3+4: giboodawedigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawedigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Prt+3+4: giboodawebanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawebanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawegobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawegobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: boodawesiimindig
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: boodawesiiminban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: boodawesiimingoban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: boodawesiimwdig
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: boodawesiimwban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: boodawesiimwgoban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: boodawesiiwdig
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: boodawesiiwban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: boodawesiiwgoban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: boodawesiimdig
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: boodawesiimban
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: boodawesiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: boodawesiiminan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: boodawesiiminag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: boodawesiimwan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: boodawesiimwag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: boodawesiiwan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: boodawesiiwag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: boodawesiiman
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: boodawesiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: boodawesiidigan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiidigag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: boodawesiibanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: boodawesiibanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawesiigobanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: boodawemindigan
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: boodawemindigag
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: boodaweminbanan
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: boodaweminbanag
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawemingobanan
     boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawemingobanag
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: boodawemwdigan
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: boodawemwdigag
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: boodawemwbanan
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: boodawemwbanag
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawemwgobanan
     boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawemwgobanag
     boodawe+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: boodawewdigan
     boodawe+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: boodawewdigag
     boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: boodawewbanan
     boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: boodawewbanag
     boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawewgobanan
     boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawewgobanag
     boodawe+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: boodawemdigan
     boodawe+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: boodawemdigag
     boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: boodawembanan
     boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: boodawembanag
     boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawemgobanan
     boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawemgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: niboodawesiimindig
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: niboodawesiiminban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: niboodawesiimingoban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: niboodawesiimwdig
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: niboodawesiimwban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: niboodawesiimwgoban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: niboodawesiiwdig
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: niboodawesiiwban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: niboodawesiiwgoban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: niboodawesiimdig
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: niboodawesiimban
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: niboodawesiimgoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: giboodawesiimindig
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: giboodawesiiminban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub: giboodawesiimingoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: giboodawesiimwdig
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: giboodawesiimwban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: giboodawesiimwgoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: giboodawesiiwdig
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: giboodawesiiwban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: giboodawesiiwgoban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: giboodawesiimdig
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: giboodawesiimban
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: giboodawesiimgoban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: niboodawesiiminan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: niboodawesiiminag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: niboodawesiimwan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: niboodawesiimwag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: niboodawesiiwan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: niboodawesiiwag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: niboodawesiiman
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: niboodawesiimag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+4: giboodawesiiminan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: giboodawesiiminag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+4: giboodawesiimwan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: giboodawesiimwag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: giboodawesiiwan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: giboodawesiiwag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: giboodawesiiman
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: giboodawesiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiidigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiidigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: niboodawesiibanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawesiibanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiigobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiigobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiidigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiidigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: giboodawesiibanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawesiibanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiigobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niboodawemindigan
